Utah statutes.
53-3-703.   Violations exempted from compact.

This compact does not apply to:

(1)  parking or standing violations;

(2)  highway weight limit violations; and

(3)  violations of law governing the transportation of hazardous materials.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

